trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="Cond">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i'</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i'</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="A_V1C">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ant_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="A_V1C_GAR">
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ant_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_c_velar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ue</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ue</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uen</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ue</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uen</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajud</l>
          <r>ajudar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apag</l>
          <r>apagar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bes</l>
          <r>besar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>casti</l>
          <r>castigar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ff"/>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>defensar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enclin</l>
          <r>inclinar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enfastig</l>
          <r>enfastigar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ll"/>
        <p>
          <l>ass</l>
          <r>llassar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alabes</l>
          <r>alabesar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alberg</l>
          <r>albergar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tempr</l>
          <r>temprar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>calcig</l>
          <r>calcigar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>demi</i>
        <par n="accep_ll"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>llar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>desen</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>desenagar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>suport</l>
          <r>suportar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>empleg</l>
          <r>emplegar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enfalag</l>
          <r>enfalagar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enfeud</l>
          <r>enfeudar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>snarig</l>
          <r>esnarigar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>stupr</l>
          <r>estrupar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>impleg</l>
          <r>implegar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>malparl</l>
          <r>malparlar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manug</l>
          <r>manugar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obceg</l>
          <r>obcegar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pes</l>
          <r>pesar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
        <par n="accep_ll"/>
        <p>
          <l>arg</l>
          <r>llargar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reclam</l>
          <r>reclamar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reng</l>
          <r>rengar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>trag</l>
          <r>tragar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_GAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>devor</l>
          <r>devorar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
